lexc/verb/enhuige.lexc
LEXICON Caseforr
+PastIndefSg1:^+cPIndefSg1^§igeo§tt§AA§m            #;    ! tem/tam
+PastIndefSg2:^+cPIndefSg2^§igeo§tt§igeaa§l         #;    ! tál/tél
+PastIndefSg3:^+cPIndefSg3^§igeo§tt      #;    ! t
+PastIndefPl1:^+cPIndefPl1^§igeo§tt§igeu§nk         #;    ! tünk/tunk
+PastIndefPl2:^+cPIndefPl2^§igeo§tt§igea§t§igeo2§k  #;    ! tetek/tatok
+PastIndefPl3:^+cPIndefPl3^§igeo§tt§igea§k          #;    ! tek/tak
+PastDefSg1:^+cPDefSg1^§igeo§tt§igea§m              #;    ! tem/tam
+PastDefSg2:^+cPDefSg2^§igeo§tt§igea§d              #;    ! tad/ted
+PastDefSg3:^+cPDefSg3^§igeo§tt§igea§               #;    ! ta/te
+PastDefPl1:^+cPDefPl1^§igeo§tt§igeu§k              #;    ! tuk/tük
+PastDefPl2:^+cPDefPl2^§igeo§tt§igeaa§t§igeo2§k     #;    ! tátok/tétek
+PastDefPl3:^+cPDefPl3^§igeo§tt§igeaa§k             #;    ! ták/ték
+PastIndefSg1:^+cPIndefSg1^t§AA§m            #;    ! tem/tam
+PastIndefSg2:^+cPIndefSg2^t§igeaa§l         #;    ! tál/tél
+PastIndefSg3:^+cPIndefSg3^t      #;    ! t
+PastIndefPl1:^+cPIndefPl1^t§igeu§nk         #;    ! tünk/tunk
+PastIndefPl2:^+cPIndefPl2^t§igea§t§igeo2§k  #;    ! tetek/tatok
+PastIndefPl3:^+cPIndefPl3^t§igea§k          #;    ! tek/tak
+PastDefSg1:^+cPDefSg1^t§igea§m              #;    ! tem/tam
+PastDefSg2:^+cPDefSg2^t§igea§d              #;    ! tad/ted
+PastDefSg3:^+cPDefSg3^t§igea§               #;    ! ta/te
+PastDefPl1:^+cPDefPl1^t§igeu§k              #;    ! tuk/tük
+PastDefPl2:^+cPDefPl2^t§igeaa§t§igeo2§k     #;    ! tátok/tétek
+PastDefPl3:^+cPDefPl3^t§igeaa§k             #;    ! ták/ték
+CondIndefSg1:^+cCIndefSg1^§igea§nék               #;    ! nék
+CondIndefSg2:^+cCIndefSg2^§igea§n§igeaa§l         #;    ! nál/nél
+CondIndefSg3:^+cCIndefSg3^§igea§n§igea§           #;    ! na/ne
+CondIndefPl1:^+cCIndefPl1^§igea§n§igeaa§nk            #;    ! nánk/nénk
+CondIndefPl1:^+cCIndefPl1^§igea§n§igeoo§k #;
+CondIndefPl2:^+cCIndefPl2^§igea§n§igeaa§t§igeo§k      #;    ! nátok/nétek
+CondIndefPl3:^+cCIndefPl3^§igea§n§igeaa§n§igea§k      #;    ! nának/nének
+CondDefSg1:^+cCDefSg1^§igea§n§igeaa§m                 #;    ! nám/ném
+CondDefSg2:^+cCDefSg2^§igea§n§igeaa§d                 #;    ! nád/néd
+CondDefSg3:^+cCDefSg3^§igea§n§igeaa§                  #;    ! ná/né
+CondDefPl1:^+cCDefPl1^§igea§n§igeaa§nk                #;    ! nánk/nénk
+CondDefPl2:^+cCDefPl2^§igea§n§igeaa§t§igeo§k          #;    ! nátok/nétek
+CondDefPl3:^+cCDefPl3^§igea§n§igeaa§k                 #;    ! nák/nék
+CondIndefSg1:^+cCIndefSg1^nék               #;    ! nék
+CondIndefSg2:^+cCIndefSg2^n§igeaa§l         #;    ! nál/nél
+CondIndefSg3:^+cCIndefSg3^n§igea§           #;    ! na/ne
+CondIndefPl1:^+cCIndefPl1^n§igeaa§nk            #;    ! nánk/nénk
+CondIndefPl1:^+cCIndefPl1^n§igeoo§k #;
+CondIndefPl2:^+cCIndefPl2^n§igeaa§t§igeo§k      #;    ! nátok/nétek
+CondIndefPl3:^+cCIndefPl3^n§igeaa§n§igea§k      #;    ! nának/nének
+CondDefSg1:^+cCDefSg1^n§igeaa§m                 #;    ! nám/ném
+CondDefSg2:^+cCDefSg2^n§igeaa§d                 #;    ! nád/néd
+CondDefSg3:^+cCDefSg3^n§igeaa§                  #;    ! ná/né
+CondDefPl1:^+cCDefPl1^n§igeaa§nk                #;    ! nánk/nénk
+CondDefPl2:^+cCDefPl2^n§igeaa§t§igeo§k          #;    ! nátok/nétek
+CondDefPl3:^+cCDefPl3^n§igeaa§k                 #;    ! nák/nék
+PastDefSg12:^+cPDefSgp12^§igeo§tt§igea§l§igea§k               #;    ! ta/te
+CondDefSg12:^+cCDefSgp12^§igea§n§igeaa§l§igea§k                  #;    ! ná/né
+PastDefSg12:^+cPDefSgp12^t§igea§l§igea§k               #;    ! ta/te
+CondDefSg12:^+cCDefSgp12^n§igeaa§l§igea§k                  #;    ! ná/né
+Inf:^+cInf^§igea§ni  #;
+Inf11:^+ccInf11^§igea§n§igeo§m #;
+Inf12:^+ccInf12^§igea§n§igeo§d #;
+Inf13:^+ccInf13^§igea§ni§AA§ #;
+Inf21:^+ccInf21^§igea§n§igeu§nk #;
+Inf22:^+ccInf22^§igea§n§igeo§t§igeo§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^§igea§ni§igeu§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^§igea§ni§igeuo§k #;
+Inf:^+cInf^ni  #;
+Inf11:^+ccInf11^n§igeo§m #;
+Inf12:^+ccInf12^n§igeo§d #;
+Inf13:^+ccInf13^ni§AA§ #;
+Inf21:^+ccInf21^n§igeu§nk #;
+Inf22:^+ccInf22^n§igeo§t§igeo§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeu§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeuo§k #;

+Advan:^+ccAdvan^v§igeaa§n #;
+Adv:^+cAdv^v§AA§  #;


LEXICON AddVerbkoto
[stem]+Verb[gcat]:0     Casekoto;

LEXICON Casekoto
+Inf:^+cInf^§ae2§ni  #;
+Inf11:^+ccInf11^§ae2§n§igeo§m #;
+Inf12:^+ccInf12^§ae2§n§igeo§d #;
+Inf13:^+ccInf13^§ae2§ni§AA§ #;
+Inf21:^+ccInf21^§ae2§n§igeu§nk #;
+Inf22:^+ccInf22^§ae2§n§igeo§t§igeo§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^§ae2§ni§igeu§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^§ae2§ni§igeuo§k #;
+Advan:^+ccAdvan^v§igeaa§n #;
+Adv:^+cAdv^v§AA§  #;
+IndefPl2:^+cIndefPl2^§oe2§tt§igeo2§k  #;    ! tek/tok
+IndefPl3:^+cIndefPl3^§ae2§n§igea§k   #;    ! nek/nak
+PastIndefSg1:^+cPIndefSg1^§oe2§tt§AA§m            #;    ! tem/tam
+PastIndefSg2:^+cPIndefSg2^§oe2§tt§igeaa§l         #;    ! tál/tél
+PastIndefSg3:^+cPIndefSg3^§igetattet§t      #;    ! t
+PastIndefPl1:^+cPIndefPl1^§oe2§tt§igeu§nk         #;    ! tünk/tunk
+PastIndefPl2:^+cPIndefPl2^§oe2§tt§igea§t§igeo2§k  #;    ! tetek/tatok
+PastIndefPl3:^+cPIndefPl3^§oe2§tt§igea§k          #;    ! tek/tak
+PastDefSg1:^+cPDefSg1^§oe2§tt§igea§m              #;    ! tem/tam
+PastDefSg2:^+cPDefSg2^§oe2§tt§igea§d              #;    ! tad/ted
+PastDefSg3:^+cPDefSg3^§oe2§tt§igea§               #;    ! ta/te
+PastDefPl1:^+cPDefPl1^§oe2§tt§igeu§k              #;    ! tuk/tük
+PastDefPl2:^+cPDefPl2^§oe2§tt§igeaa§t§igeo2§k     #;    ! tátok/tétek
+PastDefPl3:^+cPDefPl3^§oe2§tt§igeaa§k             #;    ! ták/ték
+CondIndefSg1:^+cCIndefSg1^nék               #;    ! nék
+CondIndefSg2:^+cCIndefSg2^§ae2§n§igeaa§l         #;    ! nál/nél
+CondIndefSg3:^+cCIndefSg3^§ae2§n§igea§           #;    ! na/ne
+CondIndefPl1:^+cCIndefPl1^§ae2§n§igeaa§nk            #;    ! nánk/nénk
+CondIndefPl1:^+cCIndefPl1^§ae2§n§igeoo§k #;
+CondIndefPl2:^+cCIndefPl2^§ae2§n§igeaa§t§igeo§k      #;    ! nátok/nétek
+CondIndefPl3:^+cCIndefPl3^§ae2§n§igeaa§n§igea§k      #;    ! nának/nének
+CondDefSg1:^+cCDefSg1^§ae2§n§igeaa§m                 #;    ! nám/ném
+CondDefSg2:^+cCDefSg2^§ae2§n§igeaa§d                 #;    ! nád/néd
+CondDefSg3:^+cCDefSg3^§ae2§n§igeaa§                  #;    ! ná/né
+CondDefPl1:^+cCDefPl1^§ae2§n§igeaa§nk                #;    ! nánk/nénk
+CondDefPl2:^+cCDefPl2^§ae2§n§igeaa§t§igeo§k          #;    ! nátok/nétek
+CondDefPl3:^+cCDefPl3^§ae2§n§igeaa§k                 #;    ! nák/nék
+IndefSg12:^+cIndefSgp12^§l§§igea§k           #;    !
+IndefSg12:^+cIndefSgp12^§l§§igea§k           #;    !
+ConjDefSg12:^+cConjDefSgp12^§sj§§igea§l§igea§k          #;
+PastDefSg12:^+cPDefSgp12^t§igea§l§igea§k               #;    ! ta/te
+CondDefSg12:^+cCDefSgp12^§ae2§n§igeaa§l§igea§k                  #;    ! ná/né
+PastDefSg12:^+cPDefSgp12^§oe2§tt§igea§l§igea§k               #;    ! ta/te
+CondDefSg12:^+cCDefSgp12^§ae2§n§igeaa§l§igea§k                  #;    ! ná/né


!
!  3 cases, the third is Verb+Imper
!
LEXICON AddVerbtatt
[stem]+Verb[gcat]:0     Reptatt;

LEXICON Reptatt
+Inf:^+cInf^ni  #;
+Inf11:^+ccInf11^n§igeoue§m #;
+Inf12:^+ccInf12^n§igeoue§d #;
+Inf13:^+ccInf13^ni§AA§ #;
+Inf21:^+ccInf21^n§igeu§nk #;
+Inf22:^+ccInf22^n§igeoue§t§igeoue§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeu§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeuo§k #;
+Advan:^+ccAdvan^v§igeaa§n #;
+Adv:^+cAdv^v§AA§  #;
+Rep:^+cRep^§felteo§g§AA§t  Impertatt;
                    Imper1tatt;

LEXICON Impertatt
+Inf:^+cInf^ni  #;
+Inf11:^+ccInf11^n§igeoue§m #;
+Inf12:^+ccInf12^n§igeoue§d #;
+Inf13:^+ccInf13^ni§AA§ #;
+Inf21:^+ccInf21^n§igeu§nk #;
+Inf22:^+ccInf22^n§igeoue§t§igeoue§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeu§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeuo§k #;
+Advan:^+ccAdvan^v§igeaa§n #;
+Adv:^+cAdv^v§AA§  #;
+Imper:^+cImp^t§AA§t  Nreptatt;
                      Nreptatt2;
LEXICON Imper1tatt
+Imper:^+cImp^t  Nrep2tatt;
                      Nrep1tatt;

LEXICON Verb
ajz AddVerbkoto;
biccen AddVerbtatt;
billen AddVerbtatt;
buggyan AddVerbtatt;
bukkan AddVerbtatt;
böffen AddVerbtatt;
csappan AddVerbtatt;
csattan AddVerbtatt;
cseppen AddVerbtatt;
csetten AddVerbtatt;
csillan AddVerbtatt;
csobban AddVerbtatt;
csosszan AddVerbtatt;
csurran AddVerbtatt;
csusszan AddVerbtatt;
csökken AddVerbtatt;
csöppen AddVerbtatt;
csörren AddVerbtatt;
cuppan AddVerbtatt;
dobban AddVerbtatt;
durran AddVerbtatt;
döbben AddVerbtatt;
döccen AddVerbtatt;
dörren AddVerbtatt;
fittyen AddVerbtatt;
fortyan AddVerbtatt;
freccsen AddVerbtatt;
fröccsen AddVerbtatt;
harsan AddVerbtatt;
hibban AddVerbtatt;
huppan AddVerbtatt;
hökken AddVerbtatt;
illan AddVerbtatt;
kattan AddVerbtatt;
kettyen AddVerbtatt;
koccan AddVerbtatt;
koppan AddVerbtatt;
kottyan AddVerbtatt;
lebben AddVerbtatt;
libben AddVerbtatt;
lobban AddVerbtatt;
loccsan AddVerbtatt;
lottyan AddVerbtatt;
löttyen AddVerbtatt;
moccan AddVerbtatt;
morran AddVerbtatt;
mukkan AddVerbtatt;
nyekken AddVerbtatt;
nyiffan AddVerbtatt;
nyikkan AddVerbtatt;
nyisszan AddVerbtatt;
pattan AddVerbtatt;
pisszen AddVerbtatt;
pottyan AddVerbtatt;
prüsszen AddVerbtatt;
puffan AddVerbtatt;
pukkan AddVerbtatt;
purcan AddVerbtatt;
pöccen AddVerbtatt;
pörsen AddVerbtatt;
rebben AddVerbtatt;
reccsen AddVerbtatt;
rekken AddVerbtatt;
reppen AddVerbtatt;
retten AddVerbtatt;
rezzen AddVerbtatt;
rian AddVerbtatt;
rikkan AddVerbtatt;
robban AddVerbtatt;
roggyan AddVerbtatt;
rokkan AddVerbtatt;
roppan AddVerbtatt;
röffen AddVerbtatt;
röppen AddVerbtatt;
sercen AddVerbtatt;
serken AddVerbtatt;
slisszan AddVerbtatt;
szeppen AddVerbtatt;
szisszen AddVerbtatt;
szökken AddVerbtatt;
toccsan AddVerbtatt;
torpan AddVerbtatt;
tottyan AddVerbtatt;
villan AddVerbtatt;
zakkan AddVerbtatt;
zizzen AddVerbtatt;
zuppan AddVerbtatt;
zökken AddVerbtatt;
zörren AddVerbtatt;
zöttyen AddVerbtatt;
LEXICON Verb1
arrébblibben  AddVerbtatt;
eléhuppan AddVerbtatt;
elépattan AddVerbtatt;
odébblibben AddVerbtatt;
odébbmoccan AddVerbtatt;
odébbrebben AddVerbtatt;
odébbröppen AddVerbtatt;
odébbszökken AddVerbtatt;
